Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5347HV (3) 91 dg/jh H.F. 2507 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For the purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âAccount holderâ means an individual to which an account 3 or profile to use a conversational AI service belongs. 4 2. a. âConversational AI serviceâ means an artificial 5 intelligence, available by software application, web interface, 6 or computer program, that is accessible to the general 7 public and that has the primary purpose of simulating human 8 conversation and interaction through text, audio communication, 9 or visual communication. 10 b. âConversational AI serviceâ does not include a software 11 application, web interface, or computer program that is any of 12 the following: 13 (1) Primarily designed and marketed for research and 14 development purposes. 15 (2) A feature within another software application, web 16 interface, or computer program that does not have the primary 17 purpose of simulating human conversation and interaction 18 through text, audio communication, or visual communication. 19 (3) Designed to provide outputs relating to a narrow and 20 discrete topic. 21 (4) Primarily designed and marketed for commercial use by 22 business entities to assist customers in obtaining services or 23 purchasing goods from the business. 24 (5) Functions as a speaker and voice command interface or 25 voice-activated virtual assistant for an electronic device 26 widely available to consumers. 27 (6) Used by a business solely for internal purposes. 28 3. âMinorâ means an individual an operator knows is, or is 29 reasonably certain is, under eighteen years of age. 30 4. âOperatorâ means a person who develops and makes a 31 conversational AI service available to the public. âOperatorâ 32 does not include a mobile device application store or a search 33 engine solely because the mobile device application store or a 34 search engine provides access to a conversational AI service. 35 -1- LSB 5347HV (3) 91 dg/jh 1/ 6 H.F. 2507 5. âSexually explicit conductâ means the same as defined in 1 18 U.S.C. Â§2256. 2 6. âVisual depictionâ means the same as defined in 18 U.S.C. 3 Â§2256. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Conversational AI services ââ 5 minors ââ requirements. 6 1. An operator shall clearly and conspicuously disclose 7 to a minor account holder that the minor account holder is 8 interacting with artificial intelligence through any of the 9 following: 10 a. A persistent visible disclaimer. 11 b. All of the following: 12 (1) A disclaimer that appears at the beginning of each 13 interaction between the operatorâs conversational AI service 14 and a minor account holder. 15 (2) A disclaimer that appears at least once every three 16 hours of continuous interaction between the operatorâs 17 conversational AI service and a minor account holder. 18 2. An operator shall not provide a minor user with points 19 or similar rewards at unpredictable intervals with the 20 intent to encourage increased engagement with the operatorâs 21 conversational AI service. 22 3. An operator shall institute reasonable measures to 23 prevent the operatorâs conversational AI service from doing any 24 of the following for minor account holders: 25 a. Producing visual depictions of sexually explicit 26 material. 27 b. Stating that the minor account holder should engage in 28 sexually explicit conduct. 29 c. Sexually objectifying the minor account holder. 30 4. An operator shall institute reasonable measures 31 to prevent the operatorâs conversational AI service from 32 generating statements that would lead a reasonable individual 33 to believe that the individual is interacting with a human, 34 including but not limited to all of the following: 35 -2- LSB 5347HV (3) 91 dg/jh 2/ 6 H.F. 2507 a. Explicit claims that the conversational AI service is 1 sentient or human. 2 b. Statements that simulate emotional dependence on a minor 3 account holder. 4 c. Statements that simulate a romantic interaction or a 5 sexual innuendo. 6 d. Role-playing an adult-minor romantic relationship. 7 5. a. An operator shall offer tools for minor account 8 holders to manage the minor account holderâs privacy and 9 account settings. 10 b. An operator shall offer tools for the parent or guardian 11 of a minor account holder to manage the minor account holderâs 12 privacy and account settings if the minor is under thirteen 13 years of age. 14 c. An operator shall offer tools for the parent or guardian 15 of a minor account holder to manage the minor account holderâs 16 privacy and account settings if the minor has additional risk 17 factors identified by the attorney general by rule. 18 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Consumer disclosures. 19 An operator shall clearly and conspicuously disclose 20 using a persistent visible disclaimer that the operatorâs 21 conversational AI service is artificial intelligence if a 22 reasonable individual interacting with the conversational AI 23 service would believe that the individual is interacting with a 24 human. 25 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Suicide and self-harm protocol. 26 An operator shall adopt protocols for the operatorâs 27 conversational AI service for responding to user prompts 28 regarding suicidal ideation or self-harm that includes but is 29 not limited to making reasonable efforts to refer the user to 30 crisis service providers such as a suicide hotline, crisis text 31 line, or other appropriate crisis service. 32 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554J.5 Mental health care. 33 An operator shall not knowingly and intentionally cause or 34 program a conversational AI service to make a representation or 35 -3- LSB 5347HV (3) 91 dg/jh 3/ 6 H.F. 2507 statement that would lead a reasonable individual to believe 1 that the conversational AI service is designed to provide 2 professional psychology or behavioral health services that an 3 individual would require licensure under chapter 154B or 154D 4 to provide. 5 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 554J.6 Penalties and enforcement. 6 1. An operator that violates this chapter shall be subject 7 to an injunction and liable for the greater of the following: 8 a. Actual damages. 9 b. A civil penalty of one thousand dollars per violation, up 10 to a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars per operator. 11 2. The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce 12 this chapter and shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 13 administer this chapter. 14 3. This chapter shall not be construed to create a private 15 right of action under this chapter or any other law. 16 4. This section shall not be construed to make a developer 17 of an artificial intelligence model liable solely because a 18 third party used the developerâs artificial intelligence model 19 to create or train a conversational AI service. 20 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies July 1, 2027. 21